New Jersey, session 221, S419.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.32 (C.18A:35-4.36a) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. Beginning in the 2021-2022 school year, each school district shall incorporate instruction on diversity and inclusion in an appropriate place in the curriculum of students in grades [kindergarten] 9 through 12 as part of the district's implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards. b.    The instruction shall: (1)   highlight and promote diversity, including economic diversity, equity, inclusion, tolerance, and belonging in connection with gender and sexual orientation, race and ethnicity, disabilities, and religious tolerance; (2)   examine the impact that [unconscious bias and] economic disparities have at both an individual level and on society as a whole; and (3)   encourage safe, welcoming, and inclusive environments for all students regardless of race or ethnicity, sexual and gender identities, mental and physical disabilities, and religious beliefs. c.     The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with sample learning activities and resources designed to promote diversity and inclusion. (cf: P.L.2021, c.32) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.